California statutes. Corporations Code
(2) This section does not prescribe or circumscribe the facts and circumstances the superior court may consider or which remedies the superior court may grant in exercising its jurisdiction under this section, except as described in this subdivision. The superior court may make any order concerning the corporate action as justice and equity may require.

(3) Any petition relating to a ratification
 taken or proposed to be taken pursuant to this section shall be filed not later than 180 days after the notice required by subdivision (c) is given, except this paragraph shall not apply to an action asserting that a ratification was not accomplished in accordance with this section or to any person to whom notice of the ratification was required to have been given pursuant to subdivision (c), but to whom such notice was not given.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the proper county shall be the county where the principal office of the corporation is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the corporation’s agent for service of process is located.

(5) Service of the petition under paragraph (1) upon the registered agent of the corporation shall be deemed to be service upon the corporation, and no other party need be joined in
 order for the superior court to adjudicate the matter. The superior court may require notice of the action to be provided to other persons specified by the court and permit those other persons to intervene in the action.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized person” means the corporation, any successor entity to the corporation, any director, any shareholder or holder of shares purportedly issued, any shareholder or holder of shares purportedly issued as of the time of a corporate action ratified pursuant to this section, or any other person, so long as the other person claims to be substantially and adversely affected by the ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section.

(7) Any petition seeking validation of a corporate action shall identify every pending legal proceeding of which the petitioner is aware and in which (A) the validity of the corporate
 action is being directly challenged or (B) the validation of the corporate action would result in the dismissal of the proceeding in whole or in part. If the petitioner becomes aware of any additional such legal proceeding, the petitioner shall amend, or, to the extent required by applicable rules, move for leave to amend, the petition within 10 court days to identify each such proceeding. Identification of a proceeding shall include the venue or forum in which the proceeding was filed, any case number or other unique identifier assigned to the proceeding in that venue or forum, the names of the parties to the proceeding, and the date on which the proceeding was filed.

(f) If a corporate action validated by the superior court pursuant to this section would have required the filing of an instrument with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this division, or if such validation would cause any instrument previously filed with the
 Secretary of State to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation, the corporation shall file a certificate of validation to make, amend, or correct each such instrument. The certificate of validation shall have the effect as specified therein, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A certificate of validation shall consist of an officers’ certificate setting forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(2) The title of any such instrument whose making, amendment, or correction is being effected by the certificate of validation.

(3) The date any such instrument was filed with the Secretary of State, or a statement that any such instrument was not previously filed with the Secretary of
 State and, as applicable, a statement that the validation ordered pursuant to the superior court order set forth in the certificate of validation would cause any such instrument to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation.

(4) The date any such instrument shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section, which may be prior to or after the filing date.

(5) A statement that the certificate of validation is making, amending, or correcting any such instrument, as applicable, and a copy of any such instrument containing all of the information required to be included under this division for such instrument to be so made, amended, or corrected. An instrument attached to a certificate of validation pursuant to this paragraph need not be separately executed and acknowledged and need not include any statement required by any
 other section of this division that such instrument has been approved and adopted in accordance with the provisions of such other section.

(6) A statement that the validation has been ordered pursuant to subdivision (e), and a copy of the superior court order issued pursuant to subdivision (e) in respect of such validation. 

(g) Unless otherwise stated in resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or determined by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (e), a corporate action or security of the corporation ratified or validated in accordance with this section relates back to the date of the original corporate action. 

(h) As used in this section:

(1) “Corporate action” means any of the following:

(A) Any action or purported action of the board.

(B) Any action or purported action of the shareholders.

(C) Any other action or transaction taken, or purportedly taken, by or on behalf of the corporation, including, but not limited to, any issuance, or purported issuance, of securities of the corporation.

(2) “Higher approval standard” means any provision set forth in this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation was a party in effect at the time of the original taking or purported taking of a corporate action:

(A) Requiring action of the board or shareholders, at a meeting or by written consent, to be taken by a proportion greater than would have been
 required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(B) Requiring a greater proportion of the directors or shareholders to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting than would have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(C) Requiring, prohibiting, or prescribing conditions on action of the board or shareholders at a meeting or by written consent, which would not have been required, prohibited, or prescribed pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at
 the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(D) Requiring separate action of the holders of any class or series of the corporation’s shares or of directors elected, appointed, or nominated by the holders of any class or series of the corporation’s shares voting as a class or series, which would not have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section, unless no shares of that class or series are outstanding at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(E) Requiring separate action of the holders of securities of the corporation other than shares, which would not have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or
 agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section, unless those securities are not outstanding at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(F) Requiring separate action of any specified person or persons, which would not have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(3) “Security” means a share, option, or other security of a corporation.

(i) The corporation shall retain all records related to the ratification or validation of a corporate action under this section in accordance with Section 1500.

(j) If the corporation is a party to a pending legal proceeding in which (1) the validity of a corporate action sought to be ratified or validated pursuant to this section is at issue or (2) the ratification or validation of a corporate action pursuant to this section would result in the dismissal in whole or in part of the proceeding, the corporation shall notify the judge, arbitrator, or other person presiding over the proceeding at least 10 court days prior to adopting resolutions pursuant to subdivision (b) or filing a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to that corporate action. That person shall have power to stay the ratification or validation as justice and equity may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 217, Sec. 2.   (SB 218)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

149.

“Acknowledged” means that an instrument is either:

(a) Formally acknowledged as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 4 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, or

(b) Accompanied by a declaration in writing signed by the persons executing the same that they are such persons and that the instrument is the act and deed of the person or persons executing the same.

Any certificate of acknowledgment taken without this state before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a
 court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

150.

A corporation is an “affiliate” of, or a corporation is “affiliated” with, another specified corporation if it directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the other specified corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

151.

“Approved by (or approval of) the board” means approved or ratified by the vote of the board or by the vote of a committee authorized to exercise the powers of the board, except as to matters not within the competence of the committee under Section 311.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

152.

“Approved by (or approval of) the outstanding shares” means approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote. Such approval shall include the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares of each class or series entitled, by any provision of the articles or of this division, to vote as a class or series on the subject matter being voted upon and shall also include the affirmative vote of such greater proportion (including all) of the outstanding shares of any class or series if such greater proportion is required by the articles or this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

“Approved by (or approval of) the shareholders” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which shares voting affirmatively also constitute at least a majority of the required quorum) or by the written consent of shareholders (Section 603) or by the affirmative vote or written consent of such greater proportion (including all) of the shares of any class or series as may be provided in the articles or in this division for all or any specified shareholder action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

154.

“Articles” includes the articles of incorporation, amendments thereto, amended articles, restated articles, certificate of incorporation and certificates of determination. All references in this division to a vote required by the “articles” include, in the case of a close corporation (Section 158), any vote required by a shareholders’ agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

155.

“Board” means the board of directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

156.

“Certificate of determination” means a certificate executed and filed pursuant to Section 401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

156.1.

“Certificated security” means a share (Section 184), as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 8102 of, or an obligation of the issuer as described in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of, the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

156.5.

“Certificate of Redomestication” is the document by which the appropriate official of another state approves the redomestication of a California insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

156.6.

All references in this division to “chairperson of the board” shall be deemed to refer to all permissible titles for the chairperson of the board, as permitted by Section 312.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 351)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

157.

“Chapter” refers to a chapter of this Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, unless otherwise expressly stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

158.

(a) “Close corporation” means a corporation, including a close social purpose corporation, whose articles contain, in addition to the provisions required by Section 202, a provision that all of the corporation’s issued shares of all classes shall be held of record by not more than a specified number of persons, not exceeding 35, and a statement, “This corporation is a close corporation.”

(b) The special provisions referred to in subdivision (a) may be included in the articles by amendment, but if such amendment is adopted after the issuance of shares only by the affirmative vote of all of the issued and outstanding shares of all classes.

(c) The special
 provisions referred to in subdivision (a) may be deleted from the articles by amendment, or the number of shareholders specified may be changed by amendment, but if such amendment is adopted after the issuance of shares, only by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class of the outstanding shares; provided, however, that the articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority of the outstanding shares, or may deny a vote to any class, or both.

(d) In determining the number of shareholders for the purposes of the provision in the articles authorized by this section, spouses and the personal representative of either shall be counted as one regardless of how shares may be held by either or both of them, a trust or personal representative of a decedent holding shares shall be counted as one regardless of the number of trustees or beneficiaries, and a partnership or corporation or business association holding shares
 shall be counted as one (except that any such trust or entity the primary purpose of which was the acquisition or voting of the shares shall be counted according to the number of beneficial interests therein).

(e) A corporation shall cease to be a close corporation upon the filing of an amendment to its articles pursuant to subdivision (c) or, if it shall have more than the maximum number of holders of record of its shares specified in its articles as a result of an inter vivos transfer of shares which is not void under subdivision (d) of Section 418, the transfer of shares on distribution by will or pursuant to the laws of descent and distribution, the dissolution of a partnership or corporation or business association, or the termination of a trust which holds shares, by court decree upon dissolution of a marriage or otherwise by operation of law. Promptly upon acquiring more than the specified number of holders of record of its shares, a
 close corporation shall execute and file an amendment to its articles deleting the special provisions referred to in subdivision (a) and deleting any other provisions not permissible for a corporation which is not a close corporation, which amendment shall be promptly approved and filed by the board and need not be approved by the outstanding shares.

(f) Nothing contained in this section shall invalidate any agreement among the shareholders to vote for the deletion from the articles of the special provisions referred to in subdivision (a) upon the lapse of a specified period of time or upon the occurrence of a certain event or condition or otherwise.

(g) The following sections contain specific references to close corporations: Sections 186, 202, 204, 300, 418, 421, 1111, 1201, 1800, and 1904.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 20.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

159.

“Common shares” means shares which have no preference over any other shares with respect to distribution of assets on liquidation or with respect to payment of dividends.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

160.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a corporation.

(b) “Control” in Sections 181, 1001, and 1200 means the ownership directly or indirectly of shares or equity securities possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power of a domestic corporation, a foreign corporation, or an other business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

161.

“Constituent corporation” means a corporation which is merged with or into one or more other corporations or one or more other business entities and includes a surviving corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

161.5.

“Constituent limited partnership” means a limited partnership which is merged with one or more corporations and includes the surviving limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 543, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

161.7.

“Constituent other business entity” means an other business entity that is merged with or into one or more corporations and includes the surviving other business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

161.9.

“Conversion” means a conversion pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 1150).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

“Corporation”, unless otherwise expressly provided, refers only to a corporation organized under this division or a corporation subject to this division under the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

163.

“Corporation subject to the Banking Law” (Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code) means:

(a) Any corporation which, with the approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or which is authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation to engage in, the commercial banking business under Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code.

(b) Any corporation which, with the approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or which is authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation to engage in, the industrial
 banking business under Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code.

(c) Any corporation (other than a corporation described in subdivision (d)) which, with the approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or which is authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation to engage in, the trust business under Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code.

(d) Any corporation which is authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Commissioner of Insurance to maintain a title insurance department to engage in title insurance business and a trust department to engage in trust business; or

(e) Any corporation which, with the approval of the Commissioner of
 Financial Protection and Innovation, is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or which is authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation to engage in, business under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850), Chapter 21, Division 1.1 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 43.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

163.1.

For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 500 and subdivision (b) of Section 506, “cumulative dividends in arrears” means only cumulative dividends that have not been paid as required on a scheduled payment date set forth in, or determined pursuant to, the articles of incorporation, regardless of whether those dividends had been declared prior to that scheduled payment date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   (AB 571)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

“Directors” means natural persons designated in the articles as such or elected by the incorporators and natural persons designated, elected or appointed by any other name or title to act as directors, and their successors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

165.

“Disappearing corporation” means a constituent corporation which is not the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

165.5.

“Disappearing limited partnership” means a constituent limited partnership which is not the surviving limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 543, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

“Distribution to its shareholders” means the transfer of cash or property by a corporation to its shareholders without consideration, whether by way of dividend or otherwise, except a dividend in shares of the corporation, or the purchase or redemption of its shares for cash or property, including the transfer, purchase, or redemption by a subsidiary of the corporation. The time of any distribution by way of dividend shall be the date of declaration thereof and the time of any distribution by purchase or redemption of shares shall be the date cash or property is
 transferred by the corporation, whether or not pursuant to a contract of an earlier date; provided, that where a debt obligation that is a security (as defined in Section 8102 of the Commercial Code) is issued in exchange for shares the time of the distribution is the date when the corporation acquires the shares in the exchange. In the case of a sinking fund payment, cash or property is transferred within the meaning of this section at the time that it is delivered to a trustee for the holders of preferred shares to be used for the redemption of the shares or physically segregated by the corporation in trust for that purpose. “Distribution to its shareholders” shall not include (a) satisfaction of a final judgment of a court or tribunal of appropriate jurisdiction ordering the rescission of the issuance of shares, (b) the rescission by a corporation of the issuance of it shares, if the board determines (with any director who is, or would be, a party to the transaction not being entitled to vote) that (1) it
 is reasonably likely that the holder or holders of the shares in question could legally enforce a claim for the rescission, (2) that the rescission is in the best interests of the corporation, and (3) the corporation is likely to be able to meet its liabilities (except those for which payment is otherwise adequately provided) as they mature, or (c) the repurchase by a corporation of its shares issued by it pursuant to Section 408, if the board determines (with any director who is, or would be, a party to the transaction not being entitled to vote) that (1) the repurchase is in the best interests of the corporation and that (2) the corporation is likely to be able to meet its liabilities (except those for which payment is otherwise adequately provided) as they mature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

167.

“Domestic corporation” means a corporation formed under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

167.3.

“Domestic limited liability company” means a limited liability company as defined in subdivision (t) of Section 17000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

167.5.

“Domestic limited partnership” means any limited partnership formed under the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

167.7.

“Domestic other business entity” means an other business entity organized under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

167.8.

“Disappearing other business entity” means a constituent other business entity that is not the surviving other business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

168.

“Equity security” in Sections 181, 1001, 1113, 1200, and 1201 means any share or membership of a domestic or foreign corporation; any partnership interest, membership interest, or equivalent equity interest in an other business entity; and any security convertible with or without consideration into, or any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

169.

“Filed”, unless otherwise expressly provided, means filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

170.

“Foreign association” means a business association organized as a trust under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

171.

“Foreign corporation” means any corporation other than a domestic corporation and, when used in Section 191, Section 201, Section 2203, Section 2258 and Section 2259 and Chapter 21, includes a foreign association, unless otherwise stated. “Foreign corporation” as used in Chapter 21 does not include a corporation or association chartered under the laws of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

171.03.

“Foreign limited liability company” means a foreign limited liability company as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 17701.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

171.05.

“Foreign limited partnership” means any limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership, formed under the laws of any state other than this state or of the District of Columbia or under the laws of a foreign country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

171.07.

“Foreign other business entity” means an other business entity organized under the laws of any state, other than this state, or of the District of Columbia or under the laws of a foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

171.08.

“Social purpose corporation” means any social purpose corporation formed under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 2500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 3.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

171.1.

“Initial transaction statement” means a statement signed by or on behalf of the issuer sent to the new registered owner or registered pledgee, and “written statements,” when used in connection with uncertificated securities, means the written statements that are periodically, or at the request of the registered owner or registered pledgee, sent by the issuer to the registered owner or registered pledgee describing the issue of which the uncertificated security is a part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

171.3.

“Limited liability company” means a limited liability company as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 17701.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 6.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

171.5.

“Limited partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners, or their equivalents under any name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 543, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

172.

“Liquidation price” or “liquidation preference” means amounts payable on shares of any class upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution, winding up or distribution of the entire assets of the corporation, including any cumulative dividends accrued and unpaid, in priority to shares of another class or classes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

173.

“Officers’ certificate” means a certificate signed and verified by the chairperson of the board, the president or any vice president and by the secretary, the chief financial officer, the treasurer or any assistant secretary or assistant treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 98, Sec. 2.   (SB 351)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

174.

“On the certificate” means that a statement appears on the face of a share certificate or on the reverse thereof with a reference thereto on the face or, in the case of an uncertificated security, that the applicable provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 8202 and Section 8204 of the Commercial Code have been complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

174.5.

“Other business entity” means a domestic or foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, general partnership, business trust, real estate investment trust, unincorporated association (other than a nonprofit association), or a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance as set forth in Article 16 (commencing with Section 1550) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code. As used herein, “general partnership” means a “partnership” as defined in Section 16101; “business trust” means a business organization formed as a trust; “real estate investment trust” means a “real estate investment trust” as defined in subsection (a) of Section 856 of the Internal
 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and “unincorporated association” has the meaning set forth in Section 18035.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 6.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

Except as used in Sections 1001, 1101, and 1113, a “parent” of a specified corporation is an affiliate in control (Section 160(a)) of that corporation directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries. In Sections 1001, 1101, and 1113, “parent” means a person in control (Section 160(b)) of a domestic corporation, a foreign corporation, or an other business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

176.

“Preferred shares” means shares other than common shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

177.

“Proper county” means the county where the principal office of the corporation is located or, if the principal office of the corporation is not located in this state, or the corporation has no such office, the County of Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 5.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

178.

“Proxy” means a written authorization signed or an electronic transmission authorized by a shareholder or the shareholder’s attorney in fact giving another person or persons power to vote with respect to the shares of such shareholder. “Signed” for the purpose of this section means the placing of the shareholder’s name or other authorization on the proxy (whether by manual signature, typewriting, telegraphic, or electronic transmission or otherwise) by the shareholder or the shareholder’s attorney in fact.

A proxy may be transmitted by an oral telephonic transmission if it is submitted with information from which
 it may be determined that the proxy was authorized by the shareholder, or his or her attorney in fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

179.

“Proxyholder” means the person or persons to whom a proxy is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

180.

“Redemption price” means the amount or amounts (in cash, property or securities, or any combination thereof) payable on shares of any class or series upon the redemption of the shares. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the redemption price is payable in cash.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

180.5.

“Redomestication” means the transfer of an insurer’s place of incorporation from another state to this state or from this state to another state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

181.

“Reorganization” means either:

(a) A merger pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1100) other than a short-form merger (a “merger reorganization”).

(b) The acquisition by one domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity in exchange, in whole or in part, for its equity securities (or the equity securities of a domestic corporation, a foreign corporation, or an other business entity which is in control of
 the acquiring entity) of equity securities of another domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity if, immediately after the acquisition, the acquiring entity has control of the other entity (an “exchange reorganization”).

(c) The acquisition by one domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity in exchange in whole or in part for its equity securities (or the equity securities of a domestic corporation, a foreign corporation, or an other business entity which is in control of the acquiring entity) or for its debt securities (or debt securities of a domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity which is in control of the acquiring entity) which are not adequately secured and which have a maturity date in excess of five years after the consummation of the reorganization, or both, of all or substantially all of the assets of another domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or
 other business entity (a “sale-of-assets reorganization”).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

“Reverse stock split” means the pro rata combination of all the outstanding shares of a class into a smaller number of shares of the same class by an amendment to the articles stating the effect on outstanding shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

“Series” of shares means those shares within a class which have the same rights, preferences, privileges and restrictions but which differ in one or more rights, preferences, privileges or restrictions from other shares within the same class. Certificated securities and uncertificated securities do not constitute different series if the only difference is certificated and uncertificated status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 766, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

183.5.

“Share exchange tender offer” means any acquisition by one corporation in exchange in whole or in part for its equity securities (or the equity securities of a corporation which is in control of the acquiring corporation) of shares of another corporation, other than an exchange reorganization (subdivision (b) of Section 181).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1116, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

184.

“Shares” means the units into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided in the articles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

185.

“Shareholder” means one who is a holder of record of shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

186.

“Shareholders’ agreement” means a written agreement among all of the shareholders of a close corporation, or if a close corporation has only one shareholder between such shareholder and the corporation, as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

187.

“Short-form merger” means a merger pursuant to Section 1110.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

188.
